Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB263.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "smoking" in section 2 of the act of June 13, 2008 (P.L.182, No.27), known as the Clean Indoor Air Act, is amended to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Smoking." The carrying by a person of a lighted cigar, cigarette, pipe or other lighted smoking device, including an electronic cigarette.* * *1234567891011121314151617181920 Section 2. Section 3(b)(11) of the act is amended to read:Section 3. Prohibition.* * *(b) Exceptions.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to any of the following:* * *(11) Unless [otherwise increased under this paragraph,] smoking is prohibited on 100% of the gaming floor in a licensed facility, 25% of the gaming floor at a licensed facility[.] unless that percentage is otherwise increased under this paragraph. The designated smoking area must be an enclosed area with adequate ventilation system to eliminate the permeation of smoke into nonsmoking areas. No earlier than 90 days following the effective date of this section or the date of commencement of slot machine operations at a licensed facility, whichever is later, a licensed facility shall request a report from the Department of Revenue that analyzes the gross terminal revenue per slot machine unit in operation at the licensed facility within the 90-day period preceding the request. If the report shows that the average gross terminal revenue per slot machine unit in the designated smoking area equals or exceeds the average gross terminal revenue per slot machine unit in the designated nonsmoking area, the licensed facility may increase the designated smoking area of the gaming floor in proportion to the percentage difference in revenue. A licensed facility may request this report from the Department of Revenue on a quarterly basis and may increase the designated smoking area of the gaming floor accordingly. At no time may the designated smoking area exceed 50% of the gaming floor. The 20250SB0263PN0215 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board shall have jurisdiction to verify the gross terminal revenues included in the report to ensure compliance with the requirements under this paragraph. Movement of the licensed facility from a temporary facility to a permanent facility shall not require the licensed facility to revert to the minimum percentage set forth under this paragraph.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0263PN0215 - 3 - 12345678